sl-SI: Dizajn deske za deskanje na snegu: Usmerjena; Dvojno usmerjena; Zožena; Enaka konec in rep deske; Drugo
zh-TW: 滑雪板設計: 單向; 雙向; 楔型; 雙尖; 其他
it: Modello di snowboard: Direzionale; Twin direzionale; Affusolato; Twin tip; Altro
nl: Snowboardontwerp: Directioneel; Directionle twin; Taps toelopend; Twin tip; Andere
vi: Thiết kế ván trượt tuyết: Ván hướng; Ván hướng kép; Vót nhọn; Ván hai đầu; Khác
pt-PT: Design de snowboard: Direcional; Dupla direcional; Afunilado; Ponta dupla; Outro
ja: スノーボードのデザイン: ディレクショナル; ディレクショナル・ツイン; テーパード; ツインチップ; その他
ru: Форма сноуборда: Направленный; Двунаправленный; Конический; Твин-тип; Другой
th: การออกแบบสโนว์บอร์ด: แบบกำหนดทิศทาง; แบบกำหนดทิศทางแบบคู่; ตัดเฉียง; ปลายคู่; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Design snowboard: Directional; Directional twin; Conic; Twin tip; Altele
el: Σχέδιο snowboard: Κατευθυντική; Κατευθυντικό δίδυμο; Κωνική; Δίδυμη άκρη; Άλλο
hu: Snowboard kialakítása: Irányított; Irányított iker; Kúpos; Ikerhegy; Egyéb
pl: Projekt snowboardu: Kierunkowy; Directional twin; Zwężane; Twin tip; Inne
sk-SK: Dizajn snowboardu: Smerový; Directional twin; Zúžený; Twin tip; Iné
cs: Tvar snowboardu: Directional; Directional twin; Tapered; Twin tip; Jiné
ko: 스노우보드 디자인: 디렉셔널; 디렉셔널 트윈; 테이퍼드; 트윈 팁; 기타
da: Snowboarddesign: Retningsbestemt; Retningsbestemt tvilling; Tilspidset; Tvillingespids; Andet
en: Snowboard design: Directional; Directional twin; Tapered; Twin tip; Other
bg-BG: Дизайн на сноуборд: Насочен; Насочен близнак; Конусовиден; Двоен връх; Други
tr: Snowboard Tasarımı: Yönlü; Yönlü ikiz; Konik; Ikiz uç; Diğer
lt-LT: Snieglentės dizainas: Kryptinė; Abipusiai kryptinė; Smailėjanti; Simetriška; Kita
pt-BR: Formato de snowboard: Direcional; Direcional dupla; Cônica; Ponta dupla; Outro
sv: Snowboarddesign: Riktad; Dubbelt riktad; Avsmalnande; Tvillingspets; Övrigt
zh-CN: 滑雪板设计: 单向; 不完全双向; 锥形; 双尖; 其他
es: Diseño de tabla de snowboard: Directional; Directional twin; Cónico; Twin tip; Otros
fi: Lumilaudan muotoilu: Suuntaava; Kaksisuuntainen; Kapeneva; Twin tip; Muu
fr: Design du snowboard: Directionnel; Directionnel Twin; Directionnel marqué; Twin tip; Autre
nb: Snowboarddesign: Retningsbestemt; Retningsbestemt twin; Avsmalnet; Twin tip; Annet
hr-HR: Dizajn snowboarda: Directional; Directional twin; Konusni; Twin tip; Ostalo
de: Snowboard-Design: Direktional; Direktional Twin; Tapered; Twin Tip; Sonstiges